New York, session 2025-2026, S7535.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The New York city charter is amended by adding a new 2 section 619 to read as follows: 3 § 619. Rights of students during interviews. When a student is inter- 4 viewed on school grounds by an employee of the administration for chil- 5 dren's services, such employee shall provide the student with both a 6 verbal and written warning that the student has the right to refuse the 7 interview, the student must consent to the interview for the interview 8 to occur, and the student has the right to have a supportive adult pres- 9 ent at the interview. 10 § 2. Title 21-A of the administrative code of the city of New York is 11 amended by adding a new chapter 11 to read as follows: 12 CHAPTER 11 13 STUDENT INTERVIEWS 14 § 21-973 Rights of students during interviews. When a student is 15 interviewed on school grounds by an employee of the administration for 16 children's services, such employee shall provide the student with both a 17 verbal and written warning that the student has the right to refuse the 18 interview, the student must consent to the interview for the interview 19 to occur, and the student has the right to have a supportive adult pres- 20 ent at the interview. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03401-02-5